Tennessee, session 114, HB2239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-101(a), is amended by
deleting the language "venomous or dangerous snake or reptile" and substituting instead the
language "venomous or dangerous snake, insect, or reptile".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2239
012712
- 1 -